Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202537-1802
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The future vibrancy of the people, communities, and businesses of Nebraska depends on reliable sources of water;

(2) While it is in the state's best interest to retain control over its water supplies, much of the state's water resources are currently underutilized;

(3) In 2019, the state experienced historic flooding along the Platte River which caused loss of life and over one billion dollars in damage to private and public property and infrastructure;

(4) Well-planned flood control is critical to the future of the people, communities, and businesses of Nebraska;

(5) In light of the disruption from the COVID-19 pandemic and the trend toward a remote workforce around the country, people around the country are rethinking where they want to work, live, and raise a family. As people consider where to live, access to sustainable water resources and outdoor recreational opportunities will be important considerations in making Nebraska a competitive choice for the future;

(6) The state's lakes and rivers help Nebraskans enjoy the water resources in our state and make Nebraska an even more attractive place to live and raise a family;

(7) The state's water resources provide economic benefits to the people, communities, and businesses of Nebraska by helping to attract visitors from other states and boosting local economies;

(8) In 2021, the Legislature passed LB406, which established the Statewide Tourism And Recreational Water Access and Resource Sustainability Special Committee of the Legislature. The committee was tasked with conducting studies on:

(a) The need to protect public and private property, including use of levee systems, enhance economic development, and promote private investment and the creation of jobs along the Platte River and its tributaries from Columbus, Nebraska, to Plattsmouth, Nebraska;

(b) The need to provide for public safety, public infrastructure, land-use planning, recreation, and economic development in the Lake McConaughy region of Keith County, Nebraska; and

(c) The socioeconomic conditions, recreational and tourism opportunities, and public investment necessary to enhance economic development and to catalyze private investment in the region in Knox County, Nebraska, that lies north of State Highway 12 and extends to the South Dakota border and includes Lewis and Clark Lake and Niobrara State Park;

(9) After considerable study, the Statewide Tourism And Recreational Water Access and Resource Sustainability Special Committee identified the following potential opportunities:

(a) Marina construction projects or other projects identified to expand water access or recreational opportunities at Lake McConaughy and the Lewis and Clark State Recreation Area; and

(b) Projects to increase access to and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park through the construction of an event center and lodge or through other projects identified to increase recreational opportunity and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park;

(10) It is in the public interest to expand water access and recreational opportunities at Lake McConaughy and the Lewis and Clark State Recreation Area through the construction of new marinas or through infrastructure projects identified to improve access to the areas for recreational opportunities and water access; and

(11) It is in the public interest to increase access to and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park through the construction of an event center and lodge or through projects identified to increase recreational opportunity and the enjoyment of Niobrara State Park.

Laws 2022, LB1023, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB36, § 24.